Arkansas, session 2025, HB1428.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 26, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-26-101. Bed height requirement for mobility accessible rooms.
(a)(1) A mobility accessible room in a new lodging establishment shall
be furnished with a bed that measures no more than twenty-three inches (23″)
in height when measured from the floor to the top of the mattress.
(2) The bed height measurement under subdivision (a)(1) of this
section is required to be met whether or not the mattress is compressed.
(b) A lodging establishment existing before the effective date of this
act is required to meet the bed height requirement under subdivision (a)(1)
of this section only when the mobility accessible room:
(1) Requires an upgrade; or
(2) Has met the end of its life cycle.

/s/Steimel
*CRH116*
02-26-2025 10:15:27 CRH116